Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Chapter 65. Perjury

§ 2901.
Punishment for perjury.

A person who, being lawfully required to depose the truth in a proceeding in a court of justice or in a contested case before a State agency pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, commits perjury shall be imprisoned not more than 15 years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23; 1983, No. 244 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 2005, No. 148 (Adj. Sess.), § 4a; 2019, No. 77, § 13, eff. June 19, 2019.

§ 2901a.
Perjury by inconsistent statements.

A person is also guilty of perjury and may be sentenced under section 2901 of this title if in one or more proceedings before or ancillary to a court or grand jury or in a contested case before a State agency pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25;

he or she knowingly makes two or more statements under oath or affirmation which are material in the proceedings;

the statements are inconsistent to the degree that the person necessarily believed one of them to be false; and

both statements were made within the period of the statute of limitations.

HISTORY:

Added 1983, No. 244 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended 2005, No. 148 (Adj. Sess.), § 4b.

§ 2902.
Subornation of perjury.

A person who is guilty of subornation of perjury by procuring another person to commit the crime of perjury shall be punished as provided in section 2901 of this title.

§ 2903.
Attempt to suborn.

A person who corruptly endeavors to incite or procure a person to commit the crime of perjury, though no perjury is committed, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended 1971, No. 199 (Adj. Sess.), § 15; 1981, No. 223 (Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 2904.
False swearing; false declaration.

A person of whom an oath is required by law, who willfully swears falsely in regard to any matter or thing respecting which such oath is required, shall be guilty of perjury and punished as provided in section 2901 of this title.

A person who declares, certifies, or verifies in a signed writing that a statement is true and is made under the pains and penalties of perjury, and who willfully makes a false statement in the declaration, certification, or verification, shall be guilty of perjury and punished as provided in section 2901 of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended 2019, No. 77, § 5, eff. June 19, 2019.

Particular cases.

Where, in a deposition and at trial, appellant had testified he was discharged from military service because of medical complications resulting from an appendectomy, and he was actually discharged for character unsuitability, behavior disorders unrelated to the operation and apathy as a soldier, the perjury fell within this section enlarging the scope of common law perjury to include false swearing relating to any matter respecting which an oath is required by law. State v. Lawrence, 134 Vt. 373, 360 A.2d 55, 1976 Vt. LEXIS 679 (1976).

§ 2905.
In proof of loss to fire insurance company.

A person who knowingly swears to any false statement made in a proof of loss to a fire insurance company authorized to do business in this State, with intent to defraud, shall be guilty of perjury and punished as provided in section 2901 of this title.

§ 2906.
Information and indictment for perjury.

It shall be sufficient in an information or indictment for perjury or subornation of perjury to set forth the substance of the offense charged, by what court or State agency and by whom the oath was administered, and that such court, State agency, or person had competent authority to administer the same, without setting forth, other than aforesaid, the record or other proceedings, or the commission or authority of such court, State agency, or person before whom the perjury was committed.

HISTORY:

Amended 2005, No. 148 (Adj. Sess.), § 4c.

§ 2907.
Repealed. 2005, No. 148 (Adj. Sess.), § 4e.